public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aflíxer/A
alborar/A
inalŧar/A
‘nar/A
apaltar/A
inarderar/A
dexarmixar/A
adatar/A
inasidir/A
gaver/A
xbadajar/A
xbajafar/A
dexbalar/A
inbaƚegar/A
baƚordir/A
strabalŧar/A
bandixar/A
barafuxolar/A
inbarboɉar/A
inbarlukar/A
inbàter/A
batocar/A
inbautar/A
bear/A
inbeletar/A
xbertonar/A
xbevaŧar/A
xbiankixar/A
binar/A
biondidar/A
bivakar/A
inbojar/A
xboɉentar/A
bolar/A
xbolŧar/A
dexbonigolar/A
bordiđar/A
bortir/A
botidar/A
inbosolar/A
dexbragesar/A
dexbranar/A
inbrasolar/A
brigar/A
inbrodar/A
xbroketar/A
inbrular/A
budelar/A
inbulir/A
inbusolar/A
cacerar/A
scarir/A
incénder/A
acéñer/A
cetarar/A
incokar/A
dexdir/A
kondanar/A
indemoniar/A
déver/A
diƚadiar/A
predíxer/A
indoƚentrar/A
predomenar/A
indopionar/A
dotorar/A
drisar/A
reprodúxer/A
inxaltronar/A
inxenerar/A
đontar/A
radónxer/A
rinxovenar/A
konđurar/A
rièser/A
reeƚèxer/A
epiƚogar/A
eternixar/A
exonerar/A
refar/A
faelar/A
kontrafaliar/A
famejariđar/A
sfantar/A
faturar/A
faxanar/A
skarnifegar/A
spesifegar/A
sfénder/A
desferenŧiar/A
infestonar/A
infiamar/A
desfibiar/A
fikar/A
tranfilar/A
finir/A
sfioriđar/A
fiskaliđar/A
influensar/A
foɉar/A
folexar/A
forfar/A
formalidar/A
fortedar/A
fradelar/A
afrankar/A
infrapoƚar/A
defraudar/A
sfregar/A
desfríđer/A
frodar/A
fruñoƚar/A
fumar/A
fustegar/A
dexgabanar/A
ingalbanar/A
dexgaƚonar/A
dexganbarar/A
xgañoƚar/A
xgarbuɉar/A
xgarujar/A
gendoliđar/A
ingloriar/A
gomitar/A
xgorgexar/A
gradelar/A
grandexar/A
ingrapejar/A
ringrasiar/A
dexgrexar/A
ingretoƚir/A
grintar/A
xgrisar/A
grondar/A
grostinar/A
gusar/A
xguarnir/A
ingurar/A
idroxenar/A
induxiar/A
ingrotoƚir/A
reinproverar/A
intiriŧir/A
inxavaskar/A
ixoƚar/A
injarmar/A
xjavetar/A
dexɉemar/A
xɉinsar/A
ɉoŧar/A
josolar/A
dexɉustar/A
skacixar/A
skagasar/A
interkalar/A
rekalkar/A
inkalorir/A
skalsar/A
inkamufar/A
kaneđar/A
kanforar/A
skansar/A
inkañir/A
dekapitar/A
deskapuɉar/A
inkarbonir/A
deskarnar/A
inkaroƚar/A
skartedar/A
skartoŧar/A
katalogar/A
deskatijar/A
skaturar/A
kauteridar/A
skavaƚesar/A
akaxar/A
koatar/A
skoɉonar/A
kokoƚar/A
inkoƚegar/A
skomensiar/A
koniar/A
kontidar/A
kopiar/A
inkòrder/A
koronar/A
deskosar/A
rekréder/A
kriveƚar/A
krovar/A
inkuercar/A
deskular/A
traskurar/A
dexlanegar/A
lapasar/A
dexlasar/A
relèxer/A
lesar/A
xlexierir/A
ƚikuidar/A
ƚisensiar/A
sproƚongar/A
xludronar/A
ƚuxingar/A
malisiar/A
manedar/A
mañetixar/A
martiriđar/A
mastrusar/A
maurar/A
stramedar/A
amendar/A
méter/A
inmieƚar/A
inmixerir/A
amolir/A
dexmontar/A
xmorfir/A
moŧar/A
muƚar/A
xmuxegar/A
dexnaxolar/A
ninoƚar/A
renonŧiar/A
xñaolar/A
oficar/A
onbrixar/A
orbar/A
ornar/A
pacoƚar/A
spakar/A
inpaƚidir/A
inpanar/A
spapar/A
paredar/A
partorir/A
pastedar/A
inpaŧar/A
pexorar/A
spelakiar/A
propénder/A
inpensar/A
sperlongar/A
inpetacar/A
peŧolatar/A
pianđotar/A
pikolir/A
pionbinar/A
piturar/A
replegar/A
poltronixar/A
rekonpóner/A
pontiñar/A
portar/A
despotifar/A
represtinar/A
procesar/A
spuƚexar/A
puteƚar/A
dexraixar/A
rantegar/A
realiđar/A
regalidar/A
rèxer/A
inriŧar/A
roegar/A
ronbar/A
rosteƚar/A
rufar/A
dexruvijar/A
salir/A
salpar/A
insaorir/A
scantidar/A
desekar/A
prosèguer/A
seleđar/A
malsentir/A
servir/A
sfrutar/A
desimiƚar/A
sixoƚar/A
skarpelar/A
inskaturir/A
skoinar/A
skriŧolar/A
soɉar/A
solfidar/A
sopoxar/A
sovraniđar/A
spasar/A
inspeŧionar/A
spiritar/A
spuacar/A
istaƚar/A
staŧionar/A
stiletar/A
istivalar/A
strangolar/A
stringar/A
destuar/A
sudar/A
sustar/A
retajar/A
tanbarar/A
taridar/A
tavanedar/A
aténder/A
tenporexar/A
konteñir/A
intratéñer/A
tersariolar/A
retirar/A
coƚer/A
sintonixar/A
torniar/A
torxiar/A
tràder/A
trapar/A
straviar/A
intresar/A
tromentar/A
truskar/A
desakoƚar/A
ŧavatar/A
sementar/A
sercar/A
serpir/A
sigar/A
simoƚar/A
sirkoƚar/A
soƚar/A
insukarar/A
ustegar/A
vaƚer/A
xvanpoƚar/A
xvedelar/A
revelir/A
ventilar/A
rinveñir/A
vèrder/A
vergoñar/A
traversar/A
inveŧigar/A
vinaŧar/A
dexviŧiar/A
xvogaŧar/A
xvoƚasar/A
koinvòlxer/A
soxàser/A
xeƚar/A
xgurar/A
xmorgoƚar/A
xurlar/A
invertir/A
sirkumnavegar/A
fonŧionar/A
poxdatar/A
buligar/A
inɉaŧar/A
jòƚer/A
ronŧegar/A
sepolir/A
xmiaolar/A
tanar/A
bular/A
